Florida, session 2026, HB561.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
33
34 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of section
35 1004.85, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
36 1004.85 Postsecondary educator preparation institutes.—
37 (3) Educator preparation institutes approved pursuant to
38 this section may offer competency-based certification programs
39 specifically designed for noneducation major baccalaureate
40 degree holders to enable program participants to meet the
41 educator certification requirements of s. 1012.56. An educator
42 preparation institute choosing to offer a competency-based
43 certification program pursuant to the provisions of this section
44 must implement a program developed by the institute and approved
45 by the department for this purpose. Approved programs shall be
46 available for use by other approved educator preparation
47 institutes.
48 (b) Each program participant must:
49 1. Meet certification requirements pursuant to s.
50 1012.56(1) by obtaining an eligible a statement of status of
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb561 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 561 2026 Legislature
51 eligibility in the certification subject area of the educational
52 plan and meet the requirements of s. 1012.56(2)(a)-(f) before
53 participating in field experiences. An educator preparation
54 institute may allow a program participant to enroll in and
55 complete coursework while the participant is working to obtain
56 an eligible statement of status of eligibility in the
57 certification subject area of the educational plan.
58 2. Demonstrate competency and participate in field
59 experiences that are appropriate to his or her educational plan
60 prepared under paragraph (a). Beginning with candidates entering
61 an educator preparation institute in the 2022-2023 school year,
62 a candidate for certification in a coverage area identified
63 pursuant to s. 1012.585(3)(f) must successfully complete all
64 competencies for a reading endorsement, including completion of
65 the endorsement practicum through the candidate's field
66 experience, in order to graduate from the program.
67 3. Before completion of the program, fully demonstrate his
68 or her ability to teach the subject area for which he or she is
69 seeking certification by documenting a positive impact on
70 student learning growth in a prekindergarten through grade 12
71 setting and, except as provided in s. 1012.56(7)(a)3., achieving
72 a passing score on the professional education competency
73 examination, the basic skills examination, and the subject area
74 examination for the subject area certification which is required
75 by state board rule.
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb561 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 561 2026 Legislature
76 Section 2. Paragraph (b) of subsection (7) of section
77 1012.56, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
78 1012.56 Educator certification requirements.—
79 (7) TYPES AND TERMS OF CERTIFICATION.—
80 (b) The department shall issue a temporary certificate to
81 any applicant who:
82 1. Completes the requirements outlined in paragraphs
83 (2)(a)-(f) and completes the subject area content requirements
84 specified in state board rule or demonstrates mastery of subject
85 area knowledge pursuant to subsection (5) and holds an
86 accredited degree or a degree approved by the Department of
87 Education at the level required for the subject area
88 specialization in state board rule;
89 2. For a subject area specialization for which the state
90 board otherwise requires a bachelor's degree, documents 48
91 months of active-duty military service with an honorable
92 discharge or a medical separation; completes the requirements
93 outlined in paragraphs (2)(a), (b), and (d)-(f); completes the
94 subject area content requirements specified in state board rule
95 or demonstrates mastery of subject area knowledge pursuant to
96 subsection (5); and documents completion of 60 college credits
97 with a minimum cumulative grade point average of 2.5 on a 4.0
98 scale, as provided by one or more accredited institutions of
99 higher learning or a nonaccredited institution of higher
100 learning identified by the Department of Education as having a
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb561 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 561 2026 Legislature
101 quality program resulting in a bachelor's degree or higher; or
102 3. Is enrolled in a state-approved teacher preparation
103 program under s. 1004.04; is actively completing the required
104 program field experience or internship at a public school;
105 completes the requirements outlined in paragraphs (2)(a), (b),
106 and (d)-(f); completes the subject area content requirements
107 specified in state board rule or demonstrates mastery of subject
108 area knowledge pursuant to subsection (5); and documents
109 completion of 60 college credits with a minimum cumulative grade
110 point average of 2.5 on a 4.0 scale, as provided by one or more
111 accredited institutions of higher learning or a nonaccredited
112 institution of higher learning identified by the Department of
113 Education as having a quality program resulting in a bachelor's
114 degree or higher; or.
115 4. Completes the requirements in paragraphs (2)(a)-(f) and
116 whose previously issued professional certificate has expired.
117
118 At least 1 year before an individual's temporary certificate is
119 set to expire, the department shall electronically notify the
120 individual of the date on which his or her certificate will
121 expire and provide a list of each method by which the
122 qualifications for a professional certificate can be completed.
123 Section 3. Subsection (5) of section 1012.585, Florida
124 Statutes, is amended to read:
125 1012.585 Process for renewal or reinstatement of
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb561 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 561 2026 Legislature
126 professional certificates.—
127 (5) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules to
128 allow the reinstatement of expired professional certificates,
129 including each subject area coverage and endorsement held by the
130 certificateholder at the time of the certificate's expiration.
131 The department may reinstate an expired professional certificate
132 if the certificateholder:
133 (a) Submits an application for reinstatement of the
134 expired certificate.
135 (b) Completes the requirements in s. 1012.56(2)(a)-(f).
136 (c)(b) Documents completion of 6 college credits during
137 the 5 years immediately preceding reinstatement of the expired
138 certificate, completion of 120 inservice points, or a
139 combination thereof, in an area specified in paragraph (3)(a) to
140 include the credit required under paragraph (3)(e).
141 (c) During the 5 years immediately preceding reinstatement
142 of the certificate, achieves a passing score on the Florida-
143 developed subject area examination or, if a Florida subject area
144 examination has not been developed, a standardized examination
145 specified in state board rule for each subject to be shown on
146 the reinstated certificate.
147
148 The requirements of this subsection may not be satisfied by
149 subject area examinations or college credits or inservice points
150 completed for issuance of the certificate that has expired.
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb561 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 561 2026 Legislature
151 Section 4. Subsections (2) and (3) of section 1012.981,
152 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
153 1012.981 The Florida Center for Teaching Excellence.—
154 (2) The center shall, in collaboration with the David C.
155 Anchin Center for the Advancement of Innovative Teaching within
156 and Learning at the University of South Florida, do all of the
157 following:
158 (a) Develop and deliver evidence-based professional
159 learning opportunities aligned to the Florida Educator
160 Accomplished Practices.
161 (b) Develop and deliver educator training programs
162 pursuant to s. 1012.98 that integrate high-quality instructional
163 materials included on the state-adopted instructional materials
164 list under s. 1006.28, materials evaluated and identified
165 pursuant to s. 1001.215(4), and materials developed by or under
166 the direction of the department as provided in s. 1006.39. These
167 programs must focus on the effective use of knowledge-based
168 curricula, highlighting when and how to incorporate intervention
169 materials, and emphasize the importance of background knowledge
170 in building advanced reading comprehension grounded in the
171 science of reading and critical thinking skills.
172 (c) Develop and design models of high-quality clinical
173 experiences for aspiring teachers. These model experiences shall
174 serve as a standard that institutions approved pursuant to ss.
175 1004.04 and 1004.85 can adopt or adapt, enabling participants to
Page 7 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb561 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 561 2026 Legislature
176 demonstrate mastery of instructional techniques, classroom
177 management strategies, and the application of high-impact
178 teaching strategies in authentic educational settings.
179 (d) Collaborate with school districts and other
180 educational stakeholders to identify emerging needs in teacher
181 preparation and align center programs accordingly, conducting
182 gap analyses to provide comprehensive coverage of the science of
183 learning, high-impact teaching strategies, and knowledge-rich
184 curriculum implementation.
185 (e) Establish a statewide network of teachers and
186 instructional leaders equipped with the knowledge and skills to
187 mentor and support aspiring and current educators participating
188 in the center's programs. This network shall model effective
189 pedagogical practices and facilitate professional growth.
190 (f) Conduct research and disseminate findings on high-
191 impact teaching practices and the implementation of knowledge-
192 based curricula to inform policy, improve classroom instruction,
193 and address the importance of background knowledge in student
194 achievement.
195 (g) Report to the department the completion of
196 professional learning by individuals who are not employed by
197 entities with an approved professional learning system.
198 (3) The center:
199 (a) Must may submit a professional learning system for
200 approval pursuant to s. 1012.98.
Page 8 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb561 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 561 2026 Legislature
201 (b) Shall allow a certified educator seeking to renew or
202 reinstate his or her certificate to use the system at no cost
203 and submit any inservice points earned by the educator through
204 the system to the department on the educator's behalf.
205 (c) Shall provide a certified educator seeking to renew or
206 reinstate a certificate with information on school district
207 professional learning systems that provide access to inservice
208 training to persons not employed by the school district.
209 Section 5. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 9 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb561 -01-er